Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201621-2,220
Appeal from revocation.

(MBCA 15.32) (a) If the Secretary
of State denies a foreign corporation's application for reinstatement following
administrative revocation of its certificate of authority under section 21-2,218,
he or she shall serve the foreign corporation under section 21-2,212 with
a written notice that explains the reason or reasons for denial.

(b) A foreign corporation
may appeal the denial of reinstatement to the district court of Lancaster
County within thirty days after service of the notice of denial is perfected
under section 21-2,212. The foreign corporation appeals by petitioning the
court to set aside the revocation and attaching to the petition copies of
the Secretary of State's certificate of revocation, the foreign corporation's
application for reinstatement, and the Secretary of State's notice of denial.

(c) The court may summarily
order the Secretary of State to reinstate the certificate of authority or
may take any other action the court considers appropriate.

(d) The court's final decision
may be appealed as in other civil proceedings.

Laws 2014, LB749, § 220.
January 1, 2017